Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-3601
Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act, how cited.

Sections 43-3601 to 43-3608 shall be known and may be cited as the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 1.
December 1, 2026